Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-219
Labor organization; violation; penalty.

Any individual, corporation or association that enters into a contract after September 7, 1947, in violation of the provisions of section 48-217, shall be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor.

Laws 1947, c. 177, § 3, p. 585;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 277.